Massachusetts, session 194th, S1888.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
amended in line by inserting after the word “men”, the second time it appears, in line 295, the
following words:-
“; employees of the Massachusetts Port Authority who are employed as port officers and
supervisors of said employees who shall include port sergeants, lieutenants, captains, assistant
chiefs, deputy chiefs and directors”.
of 1